Washington statutes.
RCW 43.31.450

SEED act—Findings—Purpose.

The legislature finds that economic well-being encompasses not only income, spending, and consumption, but also savings, investment, and asset-building. The building of assets, in particular, can improve individuals' economic independence and stability. The legislature further finds that it is appropriate for the state to institute an asset-based strategy to assist low-income families. It is the purpose of chapter 402, Laws of 2005 to promote job training, homeownership, and business development among low-income individuals and to provide assistance in meeting the financial goals of low-income individuals.

[ 2005 c 402 s 2.]